ru: Конструкция хранения стула: Складной; Неразборный; Штабелируемый; Другое
en: Chair storage design: Folding; Non-collapsible; Stackable; Other
sv: Design av stolsförvaring: Hopfällbar; Ej hopfällbar; Stapelbar; Övrigt
pt-BR: Design de armazenamento da cadeira: Dobrável; Não retrátil; Empilhável; Outros
lt-LT: Kėdės laikymo konstrukcija: Sulankstoma; Nesulankstoma; Sudedama viena ant kitos; Kita
ko: 의자 수납 디자인: 접이식; 비접이식; 적층식; 기타
hr-HR: Dizajn skladišta za stolice: Sklopivi; Nesklopivi; Složivi; Ostalo
el: Σχεδιασμός αποθηκευτικού χώρου καρέκλας: Αναδιπλούμενο; Μη αναδιπλούμενο; Στοιβαζόμενο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Designul de depozitare a scaunelor: Pliabil; Nepliabil; Stivuibil; Altele
hu: Széktároló kialakítása: Összecsukható; Nem összecsukható; Rakásolható; Egyéb
de: Aufbewahrungsart des Stuhls: Zusammenklappbar; Nicht zusammenklappbar; Stapelbar; Sonstiges
pl: Konstrukcja przechowywania krzeseł: Składane; Nieskładane; Sztaplowane; Inne
fi: Tuolien säilytysratkaisut: Kokoontaittuva; Ei-kokoontaittuva; Pinottava; Muu
fr: Conception du rangement de la chaise: Pliable; Non pliable; Empilable; Autre
nl: Stoel opbergontwerp: Opvouwbaar; Niet-inklapbaar; Stapelbaar; Overig
sl-SI: Zasnova hrambe stolov: Zložljivo; Nezložljivo; Nakladljivo; Drugo
bg-BG: Дизайн за съхранение на столове: Сгъваем; Несгъваем; Стифиращ се; Други
nb: Design av stoloppbevaring: Sammenleggbar; Ikke-sammenleggbar; Kan stables; Annet
es: Diseño de almacenamiento de la silla: Plegable; No plegable; Apilable; Otro
it: Design per riporre le sedie: Pieghevole; Non pieghevole; Impilabile; Altro
ja: 椅子収納デザイン: 折りたたみ式; 折りたたみ不可; スタッキング可能; その他
th: การออกแบบที่จัดเก็บเก้าอี้: พับได้; พับเก็บไม่ได้; วางซ้อนได้; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Konštrukcia úložného priestoru na stoličky: Skladací; Neskladací; Stohovateľný; Iné
cs: Konstrukce úložného prostoru židle / možnost skladování židlí: Skládací; Neskládací; Stohovatelný; Jiný
da: Stoleopbevaringsdesign: Sammenklappelig; Ikke-sammenklappelig; Kan stables; Andet
vi: Thiết kế lưu trữ ghế: Gấp gọn; Không thể gấp gọn; Có thể xếp chồng; Khác
tr: Sandalye depolama tasarımı: Katlanabilir; Katlanmaz; İstiflenebilir; Diğer
zh-TW: 椅子收納設計: 可折疊; 不可折疊; 可堆疊; 其他
pt-PT: Design de armazenamento de cadeira: Dobrável; Não dobrável; Empilhável; Outro
zh-CN: 椅子收纳设计: 折叠式; 不可折叠; 可叠放; 其他